Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.065

Commission may establish foundations.

The commission may establish foundations using commission funds as grant money when the foundation benefits the dairy products industry. Commission funds may only be used for the purposes authorized in this chapter.

[ 2002 c 313 s 100.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.